Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-105
Game and Parks Commission; expenses; per diem.

The members of the Game and Parks Commission, other than the secretary, shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 and shall be allowed a per diem of thirty-five dollars for days actually away from home on business of the commission, not exceeding forty-five days in any one year.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 4, p. 444;

C.S.1929, § 81-6504;

Laws 1933, c. 96, § 17, p. 396;

Laws 1941, c. 180, § 7, p. 704;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6504;

R.S.1943, § 81-804;

Laws 1947, c. 315, § 3, p. 954;

Laws 1967, c. 584, § 1, p. 1973;

Laws 1977, LB 482, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 172;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-804;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 26.